
Security Check Required




FacebookJoin or Log Into Facebook   Email or PhonePasswordForgot account?Log InDo you want to join Facebook?Sign UpSign UpSecurity CheckPlease enter the text belowCan't read the text above?Try another text or an audio captchaText in the box:What's this?Security CheckThis is a standard security test that we use to prevent spammers from creating fake accounts and spamming users.SubmitEnglish (US)EspañolFrançais (France)中文(简体)العربيةPortuguês (Brasil)Italiano한국어Deutschहिन्दी日本語MessengerFacebook LitePeoplePlacesGamesLocationsCelebritiesMarketplaceGroupsRecipesMomentsInstagramAboutCreate AdCreate PageDevelopersCareersPrivacyCookiesAd ChoicesTermsSettingsActivity Log Facebook © 2017













 






Retirement Capital Strategies in Napa, CA 94559 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» California
» Napa
» Portfolio Management & Investment Services
» Retirement Capital Strategies













Retirement Capital Strategies


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





1455 1st St Ste 215 Napa, California 94559


Website


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
Retirement Capital Strategies is located at the address 1455 1st St in Napa, California 94559.  Retirement Capital Strategies has an annual sales volume of 1M – 1,999,999.  .For more information contact Kent  Kuhlmann, Manager or  go to www.rcsadvisor.comRetirement Capital Strategies provides Institutional Services, Insurance, Financial Management to it's customers.  For maps and directions to Retirement Capital Strategies view the map to the right.  For reviews of Retirement Capital Strategies see below.









Business Features

PRODUCTS


Individual Policies
, Mutual Funds
, Profit Sharing Plans
, Family Policies
, Mortgages
, Short-Term Policies
, Annuities
, Bonds
, Real Estate Mutual Funds
, Futures



SERVICES


Short Term Planning
, Investment Planning
, Rollovers
, Business Banking
, Financial Management
, College Funding
, Insurance
, Institutional Services
, Retirement Planning
, Banking



 


Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Website: www.rcsadvisor.com
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Employee Size: 1 To 4
Exact Employee Count: 3
Exact Sales Volume: 1750000
Sales Volume: 1M – 1,999,999
CATEGORIES:


Portfolio Management & Investment Services
Finance
Investments & Securities



People Also Viewed


Rich Jacobson Financial Advsr


1030 Seminary St Ste A Napa, California 94559




Napa Valley Investing All


1350 Pueblo Ave  Napa, California 94558




Cabral Trust


233 Daisy Dr  Napa, California 94558




Charles Schwab


935 Franklin St  Napa, California 94559




PROFESSIONAL FIDUCIARY MANAGEMENT SERVICES


Po Box 690  Napa, California 94559




Argos Wealth Advisors


4900 Redwood Rd  Napa, California 94558





Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 


Key Contacts




Kent  Kuhlmann
MANAGER
Phone: (707) 253-1195 
 



 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM













Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft

























Structured Capital Strategies Variable Annuity


































 MENU

LOG IN
 



File a Claim

Financial Professionals

Contact us

Careers

Register



Log in








 Your Goals 

Personal Goals

Retirement
Financial security
Saving for education
Life insurance protection
Saving and investing
Women's financial goals


Life's Events

Getting married
A new home
A new job
Becoming a parent
Starting a business


Life Events Cont...

Divorce
Disability/serious illness
Death of a spouse
Caring for aging parents


AXA Advisors

Discover how we can work together
Our process
Get started




 Products & Services

For you & your family

Life Insurance
Term Life Insurance
Whole Life Insurance
Universal Life Insurance
Indexed Universal Life Insurance
Variable Universal Life Insurance
Survivorship Life Insurance


Retirement

Retirement
Variable Annuities
Individual Retirement Accounts


Investments
Brokerage and Advisory Accounts
Mutual Funds


Through your employer

Retirement savings plans
403(b) plans
403(b) plans for educators

401(k) plans
457(b) plans



Benefit Plans

Benefit PlansVision, dental, life insurance and more
Find a provider




 For Employers

Your business goals

Starting a business
Growing a business
Business succession


Employee Plans

Benefit plans
Dental
Vision
Life
Short-Term Disability
Long-Term Disability



Employee plans cont...

Retirement plans


401(k) plans
403(b) plans
457(b) plans


Partner with us

Discover how we can help your organization
AXA Advisors





 Why AXA 

About AXA

What our clients say
Financial strength ratings
History
Newsroom
Careers


What we offer

Advice
Retirement
Life Insurance


AXA Advisors

Planning process
Why AXA Advisors


In the community

AXA Foundation and scholarships
Corporate responsibility
Diversity and inclusion









































Variable Annuities

Structured Capital Strategies®

Customizable and flexible strategies






Select a State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming




































Upside potential
Partial downside protection
Tax-deferred financial product

Structured Capital Strategies is a variable and index-linked deferred annuity contract designed to balance personal risk tolerance with the desire to access growth potential by combining protection features with opportunities to invest for growth.
Get started with Structured Capital Strategies with 3 easy steps:
1. Protect a Portion of Assets                 2. Investment Opportunities                 3. Select Preferences









Click here for Performance Cap Rates and for our free web-app and iPad app.










Investment Flexibility


Upside potential


Partial protection


Downloads


Prospectus




Worried about the market? Afraid of not meeting retirement goals? AXA is here to help.
Structured Capital Strategies® can help build long-term wealth with a tax-deferred structured growth strategy that includes a built-in protection feature, providing the opportunity to invest for growth up to a Performance Cap Rate with some downside protection. It offers protection from some downside risk. If the negative return is in excess of the Segment Buffer, there is risk of significant loss of principal.
What is Structured Capital Strategies®?
Structured Capital Strategies® is a variable and index-linked deferred annuity contract and a long-term financial product designed for retirement purposes. Simply stated, an annuity is a contract between an investor and an insurance company that lets the investor pursue the accumulation of assets through equities and other investment options. An investor may then take payments or a lump sum amount at a later date.
How It Works:
The Structured Investment Option permits an investor to invest in one or more Segments, each of which provides performance tied to the performance of a securities or commodities index for a set period (1,3, or 5 years) up to a Performance Cap Rate.
Once a suitable index is selected, it's tracked in the Structured Investment Option (SIO).  An an investor will then have the ability to choose the segment duration and a segment buffer.

The Segment Buffer - The built-in protection feature, in which AXA Equitable will absorb up to the first -10%,-15% -20%,-25% or -30% of any loss. An investor will absorb the loss in excess of their segment buffer. An investor is protected from some downside risk. If the negative return is in excess of the Segment Buffer, there is risk of significant loss of principal.Segment Duration - The Segment Start Date to Segment Maturity Date, available in one, three and five years.The Segment Type - The combination of the index option, duration and buffer chosen is what distinguishes the available investment options.Choice Segment - Generally have higher Performance Cap Rates - and thus greater potential Segment performance than corresponding Standard Segments, while also offering buffer protection levels of -10%, -15%, -25%.
 
Generally falling on the 15th of the month,2 the segment is established. Keep in mind, once money is invested in a segment, an investor cannot transfer from the segment into another investment option until segment maturity.
The segment start date is also the same day the segment’s performance cap rate is set by AXA. The performance cap rate is the ceiling on the segment’s rate of return. For example, if the index rate of return is 22% and the performance cap rate is 20%, the actual segment rate of return would be 20%.
Because the performance cap rate will not be known until money is transferred into a segment, which means an investor will not know in advance the upper limit on the return, the investor may set a performance cap threshold. Simply stated, the performance cap threshold is the minimum cap required of a segment before investing in it. If the performance cap threshold is higher than the segment’s performance cap rate, money will continue to be held in the segment type holding account until it is met or the entire account value is transferred out of the Segment Type Holding Account. The Performance Cap Rate Threshold remains in effect for 3 scheduled Start Date opportunities. If at the end of the 3rd opportunity the requested threshold is not met, any money in the Segment Holding Account will be swept on the next Segment Start Date that the Segments become available. For contracts issued on or after August 25th, 2014, a Performance Cap Threshold will remain in effect until after the third scheduled Segment Start Date following the Performance Cap Threshold election. For policies issued prior to August 25th, 2014, the Performance Cap Threshold is active for 90 days or if later, until amounts are swept into a new Segment. Setting a Performance Cap Threshold is not required. 
There is a risk of a substantial loss of principal because an investor agrees to absorb all losses to the extent they exceed the protection provided by the Structured Investment Option at maturity. If an investor would like guarantee of principal, we offer other products that provide such guarantees.
When a segment matures, an investor has the following options available on the date of maturity.


Transfer to the same segment type: The maturity value can be transferred to the holding account of the same segment type for investment into the next available segment. If no action is taken by the investor, this option is the default.


Transfer to a new segment type: The maturity value can be transferred into the holding account(s) of a different segment type(s) chosen by the investor for investment on the segment start date.


Transfer to the variable investment options: The maturity value can be transferred into the variable investment options of the investor's choice.


At maturity, the segment maturity value is calculated using the segment rate of return, which is based on the index’s performance rate of return, adjusted by the segment buffer or performance cap rate. Keep in mind, the segment performance is not an annual rate of return, but is measured from the day invested to the day the segment matures. It is important to know that an investor may lose principal if a negative return is in excess of the segment buffer.
At any time an investor may have the option to withdraw their money. Withdrawals may be subject to contractual withdrawal charges, normal income tax treatment, may be subject to an additional 10% federal income tax penalty and subject to a segment interim value. Please refer to the prospectus for more detailed information on the segment interim value. The segment interim value is the value of an investment prior to the segment maturity date. The segment interim value may be lower than the original investment in the segment even where the index is higher at the time of the withdrawal, prior to the maturity, than at the time of the original investment. Partial withdrawals are permitted. Unless otherwise requested, withdrawals are taken in the following order on a pro-rata basis:


Variable investment options (VIOs)


Segment type holding account(s)


Dollar Cap Averaging Account (DCA)


Segment(s)


For information about AXA’s Performance Cap Rates, click here.  
 
The Segment Rate of Return may be limited by the Performance Cap Rate, which may be lower than it would otherwise be if an investor invested directly in the applicable index. The Performance Cap Rate is not known before the Segment starts. Therefore, an investor will not know in advance in the upper limit on the return that may be credited to the Segment. Negative consequences may apply, if for any reason, amounts invested in a Segment are removed before the Segment Maturity Date. AXA Equitable, upon advance notice to the investor, may discontinue, suspend or change contributions and transfers among investment options, Segment offerings, or make other changes in contribution and transfer requirements and limitations.
Withdrawals from an annuity contract are taxable as ordinary income, not as capital gain and, if made prior to age 59½, may be subject to an additional 10% federal income tax penalty. Withdrawals may also be subject to contractual withdrawal charges. The contractual withdrawal charge declines from 5% over a five-year period for the Structured Capital Strategies® Series B version. For tax purposes, withdrawals will come from any gain in the contract first. See the Structured Capital Strategies® Fact Card and Prospectus for additional information on fees and charges associated with Structured Capital Strategies®.
AXA Equitable Life Insurance has sole legal responsibility to pay amounts it owes under the contract. An owner should look to the financial strength of AXA Equitable for its claims-paying ability.
The Structured Investment Option can protect some downside risk but if the negative return is in excess of the protection level there is a risk of substantial loss of principal because an investor agrees to absorb all losses to the extent they exceed the protection provided by the Structured Investment Option at maturity. If an investor would like a guarantee of principal, we offer other products that provide such guarantees.
The Structured Investment Option contains the ability to track equity and commodity indices. The Structured Investment Option does not involve an investment in any underlying portfolio. Instead, it is an obligation of and subject to the claims paying ability of AXA Equitable Life Insurance Company.
Certain types of contracts and features will not be available in all jurisdictions. We offer other variable annuity contracts with different fees, charges and features. Not every contract is available through the same selling broker/dealer.
This is not a complete description of Structured Capital Strategies. Annuities contain certain limitations and restrictions. For costs and complete details, contact a financial professional. 
1 Not available in all firms and jurisdictions.
2 The Segment Start Date may be delayed by holidays or other events that may affect the exchanges on which the indices are traded.


With Structured Capital Strategies® an investor can invest up to a Performance Cap Rate to potentially grow wealth for retirement, while still protecting a portion of their assets. Balance Risk versus reward by tracking up to nine indices, ranging in exposure from large cap to small cap asset classes.




Performance Cap Rate - The maximum potential ceiling or cap, that an investor may get from index gains.
To learn more about the different Structured Investment Options, click on an investment option and find out if this is the best option.




S&P 500 Price Return Index
Russell 2000® Price Return Index
NASDAQ-100 Price Return IndexSM
MSCI EAFE Price Return Index
MSCI Emerging Markets Price Return Index
Financial Select Sector SPDR Fund  
iShares® Dow Jones U.S. Real Estate Index Fund
London Gold Market Fixing Ltd. PM Fix Price/USD
NYMEX West Texas Intermediate Crude Oil Generic Front-Month Futures

Variable investment options


                    Invest for Growth - Hypothetical Example











It should be noted that there is risk of substantial loss of principal because the investor agrees to absorb all losses that exceed the level of protection provided by the Structured Investment Option at maturity.
 
If an investor is looking for even more growth potential, Structured Capital Strategies® now offers Choice Segments, which allows an investor to obtain generally higher Performance Cap Rates and still choose a protection level of -10%, -15%, or, -25%. Choice Segments are ideal for those willing to trade a small portion of their initial performance in exchange for a higher ceiling for growth.
Structured Investment Options:
S&P 500 Price Return Index
The S&P 500 Index comprises of 500 of the largest companies in leading industries of the U.S. economy. Larger, more established companies may not be able to attain potentially higher growth rates of smaller companies, especially during extended periods of economic expansion.
Russell 2000® Price Return Index
The Russell 2000® Index tracks the performance of small-cap companies. Stock of small and mid-size companies have less liquidity than those of larger companies and are subject to greater price volatility than the overall stock market. Smaller company stocks involve a greater risk than is customarily associated with more established companies.
NASDAQ-100 Price Return IndexSM 1
The NASDAQ-100 Price Return IndexSM includes 100 of the largest domestic and international non-financial securities listed on the NASDAQ Stock Market based on market capitalization. The Index reflects companies across major industry groups, including computer hardware and software, telecommunications and biotechnology. Non-diversified investing may be focused in a smaller number of issues or one sector of the market that may make the value of the investment more susceptible to certain risks than diversified investing.
MSCI EAFE Price Return Index
The MSCI EAFE Index is a sampling of securities deemed by MSCI as designed to measure the equity market performance of the developed European, Australasian and Far East (EAFE) markets. This index is comprised of over 1000 international stocks from 22 countries. Australasia includes Australia, New Zealand and neighboring islands of the South Pacific. International securities carry additional risk, including currency exchange fluctuation and different government regulations, economic conditions or accounting standards.
MSCI Emerging Markets Price Return Index
The MSCI Emerging Markets Price Return Index is a free float-adjusted market capitalization index that is designed to measure equity market performance of 21 emerging market country indices, including Brazil, Russia, India, China and others in Southeast Asia, Eastern Europe, Latin America and Africa. International securities carry additional risks, including currency exchange fluctuation and different government regulations, economic conditions and accounting standards.
Financial Select Sector SPDR Fund
Seeks to closely match the returns and characteristics of the Financial Select Sector Index, which is the underlying index. The underlying index seeks to provide an effective representation of the financial sector of the S&P 500 Index, and includes companies from the following industries: commercial banks, capital markets, diversified financial services, insurance and real estate. The Financial Select Sector Index may not fully replicate or may, in certain circumstances, diverge significantly from the performance of the index. Non-diversified investing may be focused in a smaller number of issues or one sector of the market that may make the value of the investment more susceptible to certain risks than diversified investing.
iShares® Dow Jones U.S. Real Estate Index Fund
The iShares® Dow Jones U.S. Real Estate Index Fund seeks investment results that correspond generally to the performance of the Dow Jones U.S. Real Estate Index. The Index measures the performance of the Real Estate industry of the U.S. equity market, including real estate holding and developing and real estate investment trust (REITS) subsectors. The investment performance of the iShares® Dow Jones U.S. Real Estate Index Segment is based only on the closing share price of the Index Fund. The iShares® Dow Jones U.S. Real Estate Index Segment does not include dividends declared by the Index Fund. Non-diversified investing may be focused in a smaller number of issues or one sector of the market that may make the value of the investment more susceptible to certain risks than diversified investing.
London Gold Market Fixing Ltd. PM Fix Price/USD1
The London Gold Market Fixing Ltd. PM Fix Price/USD is an international benchmark for the price of Gold. Because this Investment Segment is tracked to the commodities industry it can be significantly affected by commodity processes, world events, import controls, worldwide competition, government regulations and economic conditions. Apart from the risk associated with general commodity investing, there are risks to investing in the common stocks of commodity producing companies. An investor should be willing to accept the risks that come with exposure to foreign and emerging markets, including political, economic and currency volatility.
NYMEX West Texas Intermediate Crude Oil Generic Front Month Futures1
On the New York Mercantile Exchange, the West Texas Intermediate Crude Oil Generic Front Month Futures is the underlying commodity index of oil futures contracts. Risks involved with futures contracts include imperfect correlation between the change in the market value of the stocks held in the portfolio and the prices of futures contracts and options, and the possible lack of a liquid secondary market for futures or options, and the resulting inability to close a futures contract prior to its maturity date. Also, index options, over-the-counter options and options on futures are exposed to additional volatility and potential losses.
Variable Investment Options1
Depending on their investment outlook and risk tolerance, an investor may elect to invest in one or more of the Variable Investment Options. Unlike the Structured Investment Option, these investments do not have a built-in protection feature. These Variable Investment Options are subject to market risk, including loss of principal. Also, there are fees associated with these options, however, an investor stills benefit from tax deferral.

EQ/Equity 500 Index portfolio
EQ/Core Bond Index portfolio

EQ/Money Market Index portfolio


Dollar Cap Averaging (DCA)
Dollar Cap Averaging Program (DCA) is a service designed to reduce investment timing decisions by systematically investing in any of the available Segments over a period of either three or six months. The Program invests in the Dollar Cap Averaging Account, which is part of the EQ/Money Market variable investment option. The Dollar Cap Averaging Account has the same rate of return as the EQ/Money Market variable investment option. The Program allows an investor to gradually allocate amounts to available Segment Type Holding Accounts by periodically transferring approximately the same dollar amount to their selected Segment Type Holding Accounts. Regular allocations to the Segment Type Holding Accounts will allow an investor to invest in the Segments at different Performance Cap Rates. This plan of investing, however, does not guarantee that an investor will earn a profit or be protected against losses. We may, at any time, exercise our right to terminate transfers to any of the Segment Type Holding Accounts, limit the number of Segments that may be elected or discontinue offering the Program. An investor may not specify a Performance Cap Threshold if they elect to invest in the DCA.
Pre-Packaged Segments
Structured Capital Strategies® Pre-Packaged Segment Selections enable an investor to diversify investments across multiple securities. Diversification is important because it may lower overall portfolio risk. Consider the ease of investing in multiple asset classes with the simplicity of Structured Capital Strategies® Pre-Packaged Segments. There are three Pre-Packaged Segment Selections to choose from, offering more exposure to the Large Cap asset class through the S&P 500 and NASDAQ 100, or more exposure to the Small Cap and International asset class through the Russell 2000, MSCI EAFE and Emerging Markets allocations. Each Pre- Packaged Segment Selection consists of several Segments, each of which represents a specific percentage of the contribution.


Experiencing down market fears?
Not to worry Structured Capital Strategies® allows an investor to decide how much protection is right for them. Depending on the Segment preferences elected, AXA Equitable promises to absorb a certain portion of potential loss up to -30%.* After selecting a level of protection, an investor can have peace of mind in knowing AXA Equitable will cushion a portion of their investment from market dips at maturity.
Protect Assets - Hypothetical Example

*An investor is protected from some downside risk. If the negative return is in excess of the Segment Buffer, there is a risk of substantial loss of principal.
The Segment Rate of Return may be limited by the Performance Cap Rate, which may be lower than it would otherwise be if invested directly in the applicable index. The Performance Cap Rate is not known before the Segment starts. Therefore, an investor will not know in advance in the upper limit on the return that may be credited to their Segment. Negative consequences may apply if for any reason amounts invested in a Segment are removed before the Segment Maturity Date. AXA Equitable, upon advance notice to the investor, may discontinue, suspend or change contributions and transfers among investment options, Segment offerings, or make other changes in contribution and transfer requirements and limitations.
Investing in the Choice Segments generally provides access to higher Performance Cap Rates and potentially greater Segment performance. The cost to invest in a Choice Segment is 1% per year of duration (for example, 3% for a 3-Year Segment and 5% for a 5-Year Segment). However, the Choice cost is waived if index returns are negative, and is partially waived if index returns are positive but less than an investor's applicable Choice cost. This guarantees that the Choice cost will never bring returns below zero at maturity. Because an investor has access to a higher Performance Cap Rate, if the market is up at maturity the investor may keep a greater percentage of that growth even after deduction of the Choice cost than they would in a similar Standard Segment.
The Segment Rate of Return for a Choice Segment will always be less than (a) the Performance Cap Rate and (b) the Index Performance Rate, if positive, for that Segment. The Segment Rate of Return for a Choice Segment may be less than the Segment Rate of Return for a Standard Segment based on the same Index, Segment Buffer and Segment Duration. This will occur if the applicable Index Performance Rate is positive but less than the sum of (a) the Performance Cap Rate for the Standard Segment and (b) the Choice cost.
Withdrawals from an annuity contract are taxable as ordinary income, not as capital gain and, if made prior to age 59½, may be subject to an additional 10% federal income tax penalty. Withdrawals may also be subject to contractual withdrawal charges. The contractual withdrawal charge declines from 5% over a five-year period for the Structured Capital Strategies® Series B version. For tax purposes, withdrawals will come from any gain in the contract first. See the Structured Capital Strategies® Fact Card and Prospectus for additional information on fees and charges associated with Structured Capital Strategies®.
AXA Equitable Life Insurance has sole legal responsibility to pay amounts it owes under the contract. An owner should look to the financial strength of AXA Equitable for its claims-paying ability.
The Structured Investment Option can protect some downside risk but if the negative return is in excess of the protection level there is a risk of substantial loss of principal because an investor agrees to absorb all losses to the extent they exceed the protection provided by the Structured Investment Option at maturity. If an investor would like a guarantee of principal, we offer other products that provide such guarantees.The Structured Investment Option contains the ability to track equity and commodity indices. The Structured Investment Option does not involve an investment in any underlying portfolio. Instead, it is an obligation of and subject to the claims paying ability of AXA Equitable Life Insurance Company.
Certain types of contracts and features will not be available in all jurisdictions. We offer other variable annuity contracts with different fees, charges and features. Not every contract is available through the same selling broker/dealer.


Product Life Cycle Carrier
This is the carrier for the Structured Capital Strategies® sales kit that must be ordered together with the eight slip sheets. The carrier provides an overview of the Product life cycle.
  Download
Structured Capital Strategies® - Product at a Glance Flyer
This flyer is one of eight slip sheets of the Structured Capital Strategies®-Series B sales kit that must be ordered together.  This flyer provides an abbreviated summary of the Structured Capital Strategies®-Series B.
  Download 
Structured Capital Strategies® Fact Card
This flyer is one of eight slip sheets of the Structured Capital Strategies®-Series B sales kit that must be ordered together.  This flyer provides a detailed summary of the Structured Capital Strategies®-Series B.
  Download 
Structured Capital Strategies® - History May Be a Guide
This flyer is one of eight slip sheets of the Structured Capital Strategies® sales kit that must be ordered together.  This flyer provides a historical perspective of the Structured Capital Strategies® indices on a 1, 3  and 5 year period on a rolling monthly basis.
  Download 
Structured Capital Strategies® Pre-Packaged Segment Flyer
This flyer is one of eight slip sheets of the Structured Capital Strategies®-Series B sales kit that must be ordered together. This flyer provides a detailed summary of  Structured Capital Strategies®’ Pre-Packaged Segment Selections.
  Download
Structured Capital Strategies® - 1 Year Segment Flyer
This flyer is one of eight slip sheets of the Structured Capital Strategies®-Series B sales kit that must be ordered together. This flyer provides a detailed summary of the 1 Year Segment option.
  Download
Structured Capital Strategies® - 3 Year Segment Flyer
This flyer is one of eight slip sheets of the Structured Capital Strategies®-Series B sales kit that must be ordered together. This flyer provides a detailed summary of the 3 Year Segment option.
  Download
Structured Capital Strategies® - 5 Year Segment Flyer
This flyer is one of eight slip sheets of the Structured Capital Strategies®-Series B sales kit that must be ordered together. This flyer provides a detailed summary of the 5 Year Segment option.
  Download




























            Rated 3 out of
            5
 by
        1212 from
        helpfull
helpful but need to communicate with in the departments better.
Date published: 2017-07-17





            Rated 5 out of
            5
 by
        Russ from
        Very satisfied in Atlanta
I really appreciate the prompt, professional service.
Date published: 2017-07-13





            Rated 3 out of
            5
 by
        rar1 from
        Adequate customer service from AXA in general
Financial advisor advised me properly, regarding the additional investment.
Date published: 2017-07-09





            Rated 5 out of
            5
 by
        Anonymous from
        very proffesional
The friendly and prompt response is what I like about AXA
Date published: 2017-06-26





            Rated 5 out of
            5
 by
        Anonymous from
        friendly and responsive
very friendly and responsible service i would deffinitely  recommend it to my friends
Date published: 2017-06-22





            Rated 5 out of
            5
 by
        Hobo Joe from
        Helpful & Efficient Service
Responsive  and Accurate Guidance in Financial Planning.
Date published: 2017-06-13





            Rated 5 out of
            5
 by
        Anonymous from
        Representative interaction
Have nothing but good things to say about the representative. He is considerate of our time and keeps us up to date on where we stand with our finances.
Date published: 2017-06-02





            Rated 4 out of
            5
 by
        Don123 from
        My AXA Experience
I am pleased with my one-time RMD withdrawal request.  The request was processed promptly.
Date published: 2017-05-15







Structured Capital Strategies Reviews - page 2



y_2017, m_7, d_24, h_23
bvseo_bulk, prod_bvrr, vn_bulk_1.0.0-hotfix-1
cp_1, bvpage1
co_hasreviews, tv_0, tr_79
loc_en_US, sid_IVA0004, prod, sort_[SortEntry(order=SUBMISSION_TIME, direction=DESCENDING)]
clientName_axafinancial



bvseo_sdk, java_sdk, bvseo-3.2.0
CLOUD, getReviews, 11ms
REVIEWS, PRODUCT







Pre-Packaged Segment Selections are available only at contract issue. An investor may select only one Selection and must allocate 100% of their initial contribution to the Selection. An investor may not specify a Performance Cap Threshold if they select a package. This means they will invest based on the Performance Cap Rate declared on the Segment Start Date. If interested in the Pre-Packaged Segment Selection feature, an investor should work with their financial professional to select the package that is appropriate for them, in light of their investment time horizon, investment goals and expectations, market risk tolerance, and other relevant factors. In providing these Selections, we are not providing investment advice. An investor is responsible for determining which Selection is best for them. Investing by means of Pre-Packaged Segment Selection does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss. All funds must be received prior to the Segment Start Date in order to be placed into the Pre-Packaged Segment Selection. The Dollar Cap Averaging (DCA) Program may be elected along with the Pre-Packaged Segment Selection. Please see the prospectus for further details.
Investing in the Choice Segments than corresponding Standard Segments generally provides access to higher Performance Cap Rates and potentially greater Segment performance. The cost to invest in a Choice Segment is 1% per year of duration (for example, 3% for a 3-Year Segment and 5% for a 5-Year Segment). However, the Choice cost is waived if index returns are negative, and is partially waived if index returns are positive but less than the applicable Choice cost. This guarantees that the Choice cost will never bring returns below zero at maturity. Because an investor has access to a higher Performance Cap Rate, if the market is up at maturity an investor may keep a greater percentage of that growth even after deduction of the Choice cost than they would in a similar Standard Segment.
The Segment Rate of Return for a Choice Segment will always be less than (a) the Performance Cap Rate and (b) the Index Performance Rate, if positive, for that Segment. The Segment Rate of Return for a Choice Segment may be less than the Segment Rate of Return for a Standard Segment based on the same Index, Segment Buffer and Segment Duration. This will occur if the applicable Index Performance Rate is positive but less than the sum of (a) the Performance Cap Rate for the Standard Segment and (b) the Choice cost.
Withdrawals from an annuity contract are taxable as ordinary income, not as capital gain and, if made prior to age 59½, may be subject to an additional 10% federal income tax penalty. Withdrawals may also be subject to contractual withdrawal charges. The contractual withdrawal charge declines from 5% over a five-year period for the Structured Capital Strategies® Series B version. For tax purposes, withdrawals will come from any gain in the contract first. See the Structured Capital Strategies® Fact Card and Prospectus for additional information on fees and charges associated with Structured Capital Strategies®.
AXA Equitable Life Insurance Company has sole legal responsibility to pay amounts it owes under the contract. An owner should look to the financial strength of AXA Equitable for its claims-paying ability.
S&P®, Standard & Poor’s®, S&P 500® and Standard & Poor’s 500® are trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (“Standard & Poor’s”) and have been licensed for use by AXA Equitable. Structured Capital Strategies® is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Standard & Poor’s and Standard & Poor’s does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in Structured Capital Strategies®.
The Russell 2000® Index tracks the performance of small-cap companies. Stocks of small and mid-size companies have less liquidity than those of larger companies and are subject to greater price volatility than the overall stock market. Smaller company stocks involve a greater risk than is customarily associated with more established companies. The Index is a trademark of Russell Investments and has been licensed for use by AXA Equitable. The Product is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Russell Investments and Russell Investments makes no representation regarding the advisability of investing in the Product.
The NASDAQ 100 Price Return Index® (not available in all jurisdictions) includes 100 of the largest domestic and international non-financial securities listed on the NASDAQ Stock Market based on market capitalization. The Index reflects companies across major industry groups including computer hardware and software, telecommunications and biotechnology. Non-diversified investing may be focused in a smaller number of issues or one sector of the market that may make the value of the investment more susceptible to certain risks than diversified investing.
The Product referred to herein is not sponsored, endorsed, or promoted by MSCI, and MSCI bears no liability with respect to any such Product or any index on which such Product is based. The prospectus contains a more detailed description of the limited relationship MSCI has with AXA Equitable and any related products.
The MSCI EAFE Price Return Index is a sampling of securities deemed by MSCI as designed to measure the equity market performance of the developed European, Australasian and Far East (EAFE) markets. Australasia includes Australia, New Zealand and neighboring islands of the South Pacific. International securities carry additional risks, including currency exchange fluctuation and different government regulations, economic conditions and accounting standards.
The MSCI Emerging Markets Price Return Index (not available in all jurisdictions) is a free float-adjusted market capitalization index that is designed to measure equity market performance of 21 emerging market country indices, including Brazil, Russia, India, China and others in Southeast Asia, Eastern Europe, Latin America and Africa. International securities carry additional risks, including currency exchange fluctuation and different government regulations, economic conditions and accounting standards.
The Financial Select Sector SPDR Fund (not available in all jurisdictions) seeks to closely match the returns and characteristics of the Financial Select Sector Index, which is the underlying index. The underlying index seeks to provide an effective representation of the financial sector of the S&P 500 Index, and includes companies from the following industries: commercial banks, capital markets, diversified financial services, insurance and real estate. The Financial Select Sector Fund may not fully replicate or may, in certain circumstances, diverge significantly from the performance of the index. Non-diversified investing may be focused in a smaller number of issues or one sector of the market that may make the value of the investment more susceptible to certain risks than diversified investing.
This Structured Capital Strategies® variable annuity is not sponsored, endorsed, authorized, sold or promoted by the Select Sector Trust, or SSgA FM. Neither the Select Sector Trust nor SSgA FM makes any representations or warranties to purchasers of the variable annuity or any member of the public regarding the advisability of investing in the variable annuity. Neither the Select Sector Trust nor SSgA FM has any obligation or liability in connection with the operation, marketing, trading or sale of the variable annuity.
The iShares® Dow Jones U.S. Real Estate Index Fund (not available in all jurisdictions) seeks investment results that correspond generally to the performance of the Dow Jones U.S. Real Estate Index. The Index measures the performance of the Real Estate industry of the U.S. equity market, including real estate holding and developing and real estate investment trust (REITS) subsectors. The investment performance of the iShares® Dow Jones U.S. Real Estate Index Segment is based only on the closing share price of the Index Fund. The iShares® Dow Jones U.S. Real Estate Index Segment does not include dividends declared by the Index Fund. Non-diversified investing may be focused in a smaller number of issues or one sector of the market that may make the value of the investment more susceptible to certain risks than diversified investing.
The London Gold Market Fixing Ltd PM Fix Price/USD (Gold Index) (not available in all jurisdictions) is an international benchmark for the price of Gold. Because this Investment Segment is tracked to the commodities industry, it can be significantly affected by commodity process, world events, import controls, worldwide competition, government regulations, and economic conditions. Apart from the risks associated with general commodity investing, there are risks to investing in the common stocks of commodity producing companies. An investor should be willing to accept the risks that come with exposure to foreign and emerging markets, including political, economic and currency volatility.
The NYMEX West Texas Intermediate Crude Oil Generic Front Month Futures (Oil Index) (not available in all jurisdictions) is the underlying commodity index of oil futures contracts. Risks involved with futures contracts include imperfect correlation between the change in the market value of the stocks held by the portfolio and the prices of futures contracts and options, and the possible lack of a liquid secondary market for futures or options contracts, and the resulting inability to close a futures contract prior to its maturity date. Also, index options, over-the-counter options, and options on futures are exposed to additional volatility and potential losses.
All contract and rider guarantees, including optional benefits and any fixed subaccount crediting rates or annuity payout rates, are backed by the claims-paying ability of AXA Equitable. They are not backed by the broker/dealer from which this annuity is purchased, by the insurance agency from which this annuity is purchased or any affiliates of those entities and none makes any representations or guarantees regarding the claims-paying ability of AXA Equitable.
Structured Capital Strategies® is a long term retirement product which contains fees for administration, sales, and certain expense risks.  Variable annuities are subject to market risk including loss of principal.
Structured Capital Strategies® (August 2014 version) is issued by AXA Equitable Life Insurance Company, New York, NY 10104 and co-distributed by affiliates AXA Advisors, LLC and AXA Distributors, LLC (members FINRA, SIPC). Visit our website at www.axa.com. An investor can contact us at (212) 554-1234 to find out the availability of other contracts.
Contract form #s: 2010PCSBASE-I-A/B and 2010PCSBASE-A/B and any state variations
“AXA” is the brand name of AXA Equitable Financial Services, LLC and its family of companies, including AXA Equitable Life Insurance Company (NY, NY), AXA Advisors, LLC, and AXA Distributors, LLC. AXA S.A. is a French holding company for a group of international insurance and financial services companies, including AXA Equitable Financial Services, LLC. The obligations of AXA Equitable Life Insurance Company are backed solely by their claims-paying ability.
© 2014 AXA Equitable Life Insurance Company. All rights reserved. Structured Capital Strategies® is patent-approved. Patent no. 8,645,261.
1290 Avenue of the Americas, New York, NY 10104, (212) 554-1234GE-97195 (8/14)












 Find a financial professional













Have a financial professional contact you:























I'm interested in...
Annuities
Business Planning
Education Planning
Estate Planning
Investing and Brokerage Services
Life Insurance
Retirement Planning
Other



Submit All fields are required





Or, find a financial professional near you:
Search
Already working with a financial professional?Login for contact information.
Log in



















            	Contact us 888-AXA-INFO (292-4636)










Link to Facebook
Link to Twitter">
Link to LinkedIn











"AXA" is the brand name of AXA Equitable Financial Services, LLC and its family of companies, including AXA Equitable Life Insurance Company (NY,NY), MONY Life Insurance Company of America (AZ stock company, administrative office: Jersey City, N.J.), AXA Advisors, LLC (member FINRA, SIPC), and AXA Distributors, LLC (member SIPC). AXA S.A. is a French holding company for a group of international insurance and financial services companies, including AXA Equitable Financial Services, LLC. The obligations of AXA Equitable Life Insurance Company and MONY Life Insurance Company of America are backed solely by their claims-paying ability.

&copy 1999-2017 AXA Equitable Life Insurance Company

1290 Avenue of the Americas, New York, NY 10104



Online Privacy and Security

Usage Agreement


GE-107714(09/15)





















Capital Strategies Retirement and Financial Planning | About Capital Strategies

















































contact us
client portal 













About Us

How We Are Different
Meet Our Team

Barbara J. Best, AIF
Alison Bettonville, CFA
Christi Bonaccorsi
Neil Davies, CPWA®
Mike Rarey, CFA
Nancy M. Rizzuto
Michael Warford, CFA
Will Woodall, AIF


Fiduciary Responsibility
Making a Difference


Services

Fiduciary Investment Advisory

Governance Support
Investment Advisory
Retirement Consulting
Provider Management
Employee Engagement


Private Wealth
Asset Management


Resource Center

Market Observations
Weekly Market Monitor
Fiduciary News
Industry Links


 






















Capital Strategies  //  About Us 
● About Us ●








Capital Strategies specializes in helping organizations successfully manage their investment and retirement programs.
We are the standard-bearer of absolute independence – combining a conflict free business strategy, exceptional service, adaptability, and the right people to partner with you in achieving peace of mind.
Our comprehensive advisory services are tailored to meet the broad needs of each client based on their specific goals and objectives. The hallmark of our firm is grounded in our absolute independence which ensures that 100% of our recommendations are made in your best interest.


History In 2003 after many years of financial industry experience, Capital Strategies’ founders joined forces to build an organization committed to delivering truly independent conflict-free advice regarding investments and other aspects of retirement programs that impact the success of plan sponsors and fiduciaries. Our clients were seeking our comprehensive expertise, in-depth knowledge to craft fact-based decisions and leadership to support the approval and implementation of these solutions.


Who We Are Today  Capital Strategies specializes in helping organizations successfully manage their investment and retirement programs. Our institutional pools of assets include defined benefit plans, defined contribution (401(k), 403(b), 457 and non-qualified) plans, operating accounts, endowments and foundations. A highly specialized and growing firm, we have built a powerful, independent research team so clients can rely on our independent perspective and assurance that recommendations are made solely in their best interest.


Community Involvement  Each year, Capital Strategies is pleased to support a number of organizations whose initiatives inspire us. We contribute to them financially and through sweat equity – actively involved in their programming, activities and/or events.
We are inspired by these organizations – their committed leadership, volunteers and most importantly, the people and causes they serve and the lives that are enriched as a result of their missions. To learn about some of the organizations that Capital Strategies has recently had the privilege of supporting, click here.




How We Are Different
Meet Our Team
Fiduciary Responsibility
Making a Difference












Subscribe
Sign up to receive our publications.




First Name*Last Name*Email*

 









 










One Parkview Plaza, Suite 620 Oakbrook Terrace, IL 60181-4400
Phone: 630.320.5100  Fax: 630.320.5107
info@capstratig.com












© 2017 Capital Strategies Investment Group LLC. Published in the U.S.A. All rights reserved.Privacy Policy

About Us

How We Are Different
Meet Our Team

Barbara J. Best, AIF
Alison Bettonville, CFA
Christi Bonaccorsi
Neil Davies, CPWA®
Mike Rarey, CFA
Nancy M. Rizzuto
Michael Warford, CFA
Will Woodall, AIF


Fiduciary Responsibility
Making a Difference


Services

Fiduciary Investment Advisory

Governance Support
Investment Advisory
Retirement Consulting
Provider Management
Employee Engagement


Private Wealth
Asset Management


Resource Center

Market Observations
Weekly Market Monitor
Fiduciary News
Industry Links


 




















Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.




Retirement Capital Strategies Inc                                                                                        - San Jose                                          , CA         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



CA



San Jose



Business Services, Nec



Financial Services



                            Retirement Capital Strategies Inc
                                    



 





















R 


Retirement Capital Strategies Inc                                                                                       
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



1190 SARATOGA AVE STE 140 SAN JOSE, CA 95129
Get Directions



(408) 551-6100
www.rcsadvisor.com                                                                                      





Business Info



 Founded 2001
 Incorporated CA
 Annual Revenue $1,476,145.00
 Employee Count 5
 Industries Financial Services
 Contacts Thomas Vaughan                                                                                                          







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Retirement Capital Strategies Inc                                                                                        was founded in 2001. The company is located in San Jose and incorporated in California. Retirement Capital Strategies Inc                                                                                        specializes in Financial Services. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







R

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















Team – Retirement Capital Strategies





































 





























HomeTeam
Blog
Services

About Us
Awards and Recognition
Need a Second Opinion?
Financial Planning for Women
Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Retirement Planning
Money Management and Investment Strategy
Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Resources

Weekly Market Commentary

Archive – Weekly Market Commentary (2013 – Present)


Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Our NEW APP Is Here!
Retirement Accounts

Protecting Retirement Assets
Required Minimum Distributions – RMD


Social Security

Social Security:  A Strategic Approach
Understanding Social Security:  Three dates to remember
Social Security:  Important Changes for 2016 and Later Years


Long Term Care (LTC)

Long Term Care (LTC) Financial Responsibility Case


College Planning

College Planning and Saving


Identity Theft

Identity Theft Protection


Changing Jobs?
Records Management

Keeping Records
What should I Shred?


Managing Your Credit

Taking Charge of Your Credit Score


Estate Planning

Have you updated your IRA beneficiaries lately?
Estate Planning After Divorce – Rethinking
Questions to Ask When Drafting an Estate Plan
Simplify Estate Planning With a Living Trust
Should You Bypass the Bypass Trust?
What You Need to Know about Your Will
Creating a Plan for Effective Wealth Transfer
Advance Directives: Planning Ahead for Your Own Care
﻿Protect Your Assets With a Trust


Women Investors

Financial Planning for Women
Women and Financial Confidence
Women Wealth and Legacy Planning


Tax Planning

Strategy for Making Charitable Contributions


Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Videos
Clients

Review Questionnaire
Account View
Go Paperless
ARCHIVE – Review Questionnaire


Contact












Home » Team 


                                Team                            
 




Our team structure allows each advisor to specialize in a different area that may be important to your retirement.
 
 
 
 
 
Our specialties at Retirement Capital Strategies include:

Money management
Retirement plan distributions
Estate planning
Stock options
Retirement planning for women
Charitable and legacy planning
Required minimum distributions
Financial issues that arrive from divorce
Social Security
Long-term care
Real estate investments

These specializations allow us to offer a wider and deeper level of knowledge.
Another powerful benefit of working with an advisory team is the ability to have a highly qualified team member immediately available to help you even if your dedicated team members are unavailable.
We specialize in Retirement Income Planning and function as a team, but our most valued feature is the six people who work here. These professional team members are only available here at Retirement Capital Strategies.
Let us introduce you to the members of our team:
Advisors
Our three financial advisors are the ones you meet with to discuss the markets, the economy and your investment portfolios. Our advisors have extensive backgrounds in retirement income planning.
 
Financial Advisor / LPL Financial Registered Representative
CA Insurance No. 0F21186
Bill Weihman, CFP®, is a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ Practitioner, having joined RCS in 2005 after working collaboratively with several distinguished financial planners in the South Bay. Bill also spent eleven years with Nike where he led a staff of 50. Originally from the New York area, Bill’s education includes The Hotchkiss School, Harrow School (London), the Université de Strasbourg (France), and St. Lawrence University. Following in the steps of his father’s investment career, Bill has been practicing personal portfolio management since 1987. In 2004 he completed the graduate program in Personal Financial Planning with honors from the University of California Extension. He is an active member of the Silicon Valley chapter of the Financial Planning Association, and he enjoys hockey, cycling, and running in his free time. Bill’s specialties include charitable and legacy planning and required minimum distributions.
 
Financial Advisor / LPL Financial Registered Representative
CA Insurance No. 0C89497
Margaret (Peggy) Stephan, CFP®, is a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ practitioner. Peggy began her financial planning career in 1992, serving as the Command Financial Specialist while on active duty with the United States Navy. Peggy has worked in the securities industry for Merrill Lynch, where she achieved their designation of Certified Financial Manager, and at Wales Investments in San Jose, where she was the financial planner and Chief Compliance Officer. Peggy holds a Bachelor’s degree from the University of California at Berkeley. Peggy has been a member of the Financial Planning Association since 2000. Through the FPA, she coordinated a program for providing pro bono financial planning education and assistance to military families, including reservists in the local area. While on active duty, Peggy led carrier-based air logistics missions in the Western Pacific and Persian Gulf, and also flew the LC-130 Hercules in support of the National Science Foundation’s United States Antarctic Program. Peggy serves on the Board of Directors of the Moffett Field Historical Society and Museum. In her free time, she enjoys diving, hiking, travel and camping with her daughters. Peggy’s areas of specialty include Social Security, long-term care and financial issues that arise from divorce.

Financial Advisor / LPL Financial Registered Representative
CA Insurance No. 0637436
Camilla (Cam) Neri began her advising career in 1980. In 2006 & 2007, she was named one of the Top 100 Women Financial Advisors by Barron’s Magazine. Cam was also named as one of America’s Top 100 Independent Advisors for 2007 by Registered Rep Magazine as well as one of the Top 25 Wealth Advisors by the Silicon Valley / San Jose Business Journal in 2008. Cam was also among the Top 50 Independent Broker/Dealer Women Advisors in 2011 by Registered Rep magazine.* Prior to joining RCS, Cam formed and ran Neri Financial Services and was a partner at Crest Financial Services. Cam earned her undergraduate degree at Knox College in Illinois and Master’s Degree from Stanford University. She is on the Board of Silicon Valley Planned Giving and was on the Business Advisory Council for Knox College. Cam is an active member of the local chapter of the Financial Planning Association, as well as Leave a Legacy of Silicon Valley. In her free time, Cam enjoys hiking, cooking and reading mysteries. Her specialties include retirement planning for women, retirement plan distributions, estate planning and stock options.
*The Barron’s award (2006, 2007) is based on assets managed, revenue produced and quality of practice. The Business Journal award (2008) is based on assets under management, experience, and other factors. The Registered Rep awards (2007, 2011) are based on assets under management.
 
Client Services
Our Client Service Representatives are your first point of contact for day to day service needs of your accounts. They pride themselves on responding to every need in a timely manner. You will find them to be knowledgeable, professional, and helpful.
 
Operations Manager / LPL Registered Sales Assistant
Theresa L. Vasquez has been servicing clients in the financial services industry since 2000 and joined Retirement Capital Strategies in 2006.  She is registered with LPL Financial and holds a Series 6 and 63 Securities licenses. Theresa divides her time as the Manager of Operations and as your Client Service Representative.  She is responsible for entering all of the day to day trading for the firm as well as assisting clients with all of their account service needs. Theresa enjoys spending her free time with her husband, two daughters and extended family.
 

Project Manager / Client Service Associate
Marie Ann Marinovich has been with Retirement Capital Strategies since 2005 and has worked in the financial services industry for 17 years. Marie holds a Bachelor’s degree from San Jose State University and a Master’s Degree from St. Mary’s College of California. She has a broad background in project management, operations management, computer systems and has held multiple Microsoft Certified Professional (MCP) technology certifications. Marie divides her time between coordination of sales and marketing projects and initiatives, seminars, client events and as a Client Service Representative. Marie enjoys spending time with her boyfriend, family and friends as well as cycling and the outdoors.
 

Management
LPL Branch Manager / LPL Financial Registered Principal
CA Insurance No. 0745546
Thomas (Tom) Vaughan is the founder of Retirement Capital Strategies and serves as our LPL Branch Manager. Tom began his financial advising career in 1987 with First Investors Corporation, a Wall Street-based investment firm, though he has been investing in the stock market since the age of twelve. Tom graduated as a Dean’s Scholar from San Jose State University. He volunteers regularly in the classroom at a local elementary school, and he has served in the past on the Board of the Boys and Girls Club. In addition, Tom currently helps guide his young son’s award-winning golf career. Tom’s specialty is crafting our portfolio strategies.
 
CEO / Financial Advisor / LPL Financial Registered Representative
CA Insurance No. 0B51320
Mike Philipp is CEO of Retirement Capital Strategies. Mike began his investment career in 1993. He has a Bachelor’s degree from San Jose State University and received an MBA from Golden Gate University. Prior to joining RCS, he managed several manufacturing companies in Silicon Valley.  Mike and his wife have two children. As Chief Compliance Officer, Mike is also responsible for ensuring our compliance program stays current with regulations.
If you have any comments or concerns, please don’t hesitate to call us at 408-551-6100 or toll free 800-927-8314 and ask to speak with one of our financial advisors or send us an email through our Contact Us section.
 
Best Regards,
Retirement Capital Strategies
A Registered Investment Advisor
1190 Saratoga Ave, Ste. 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel (408) 551-6100
www.rcsadvisor.com








Not Receiving Our Emails? 
Join Our Email List
For Email Newsletters you can trust.


Please follow & like us: 

 

Search Our Site:





Blog Posts 

Giving Back: 6th Year Celebrating International Women’s Day 2017


YOU’RE INVITED . . . International Women’s Day Event


Art Show Photos


Blog CategoriesBlog Categories
Select Category
Annuities  (1)
Awards and Recognition  (3)
Certified Financial Planner  (3)
CFP  (3)
Charitable Contributions  (1)
Community Involvement  (2)
Divorce  (2)
Divorce Planning  (2)
Estate Planning  (2)
ETF  (1)
Events  (6)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)  (1)
Financial Planner  (4)
Financial Planning  (5)
Financial Planning for Women  (4)
Giving Back  (4)
Identity Theft  (1)
Investing  (2)
Markets  (7)
Press Release  (4)
Retirement  (5)
Retirement Income Planning  (5)
Retirement Plan Distributions  (3)
Social Security  (2)
Taxes  (3)
Women  (4)
Women and Money  (2)
Women in Transition  (3)
Women Investors  (4)



FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 













Contact Us Retirement Capital Strategies
1190 Saratoga Ave, Ste. 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel (408) 551-6100
Fax (408) 551-6161
www.rcsadvisor.com

FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 





Search Our Site:





 Market UpdatesFixed Income As A Diversifier July 27, 2017Historically, the bond market has been a pretty good indicator of increased potential for economic and geopolitical risk, and thus far we see little stress evident in the fixed income markets. Nonetheless, higher rates of economic growth and inflation, along … Continue reading → lplresearch 



Please follow & like us: 

 





Not Receiving Our Emails? Join Our Email ListFor Email Marketing you can trust. 

 








Retirement Capital Strategies - Financial Planning, Retirement Planning, Money Management, Certified Financial Planners, CFP, San Jose, CA





Securities offered through LPL Financial, Member FINRA/SIPC. Investment advice offered through Retirement Capital Strategies, a registered investment advisor and separate entity from LPL Financial.

The LPL Financial registered representatives associated with this site may only discuss and/or transact securities business with residents of the following states: AZ, CA, CO, CT, FL, HI, ID, IL, IN, MA, MD, MI, MN, MO, MT, NC, NJ, NM, NV, NY, OH, OK, OR, PA, SD, TN, TX, UT, VA, VT, WA, WI.










 

close
 
 














Social media & sharing icons powered by UltimatelySocial 


















Team – Retirement Capital Strategies





































 





























HomeTeam
Blog
Services

About Us
Awards and Recognition
Need a Second Opinion?
Financial Planning for Women
Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Retirement Planning
Money Management and Investment Strategy
Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Resources

Weekly Market Commentary

Archive – Weekly Market Commentary (2013 – Present)


Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Our NEW APP Is Here!
Retirement Accounts

Protecting Retirement Assets
Required Minimum Distributions – RMD


Social Security

Social Security:  A Strategic Approach
Understanding Social Security:  Three dates to remember
Social Security:  Important Changes for 2016 and Later Years


Long Term Care (LTC)

Long Term Care (LTC) Financial Responsibility Case


College Planning

College Planning and Saving


Identity Theft

Identity Theft Protection


Changing Jobs?
Records Management

Keeping Records
What should I Shred?


Managing Your Credit

Taking Charge of Your Credit Score


Estate Planning

Have you updated your IRA beneficiaries lately?
Estate Planning After Divorce – Rethinking
Questions to Ask When Drafting an Estate Plan
Simplify Estate Planning With a Living Trust
Should You Bypass the Bypass Trust?
What You Need to Know about Your Will
Creating a Plan for Effective Wealth Transfer
Advance Directives: Planning Ahead for Your Own Care
﻿Protect Your Assets With a Trust


Women Investors

Financial Planning for Women
Women and Financial Confidence
Women Wealth and Legacy Planning


Tax Planning

Strategy for Making Charitable Contributions


Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Videos
Clients

Review Questionnaire
Account View
Go Paperless
ARCHIVE – Review Questionnaire


Contact












Home » Team 


                                Team                            
 




Our team structure allows each advisor to specialize in a different area that may be important to your retirement.
 
 
 
 
 
Our specialties at Retirement Capital Strategies include:

Money management
Retirement plan distributions
Estate planning
Stock options
Retirement planning for women
Charitable and legacy planning
Required minimum distributions
Financial issues that arrive from divorce
Social Security
Long-term care
Real estate investments

These specializations allow us to offer a wider and deeper level of knowledge.
Another powerful benefit of working with an advisory team is the ability to have a highly qualified team member immediately available to help you even if your dedicated team members are unavailable.
We specialize in Retirement Income Planning and function as a team, but our most valued feature is the six people who work here. These professional team members are only available here at Retirement Capital Strategies.
Let us introduce you to the members of our team:
Advisors
Our three financial advisors are the ones you meet with to discuss the markets, the economy and your investment portfolios. Our advisors have extensive backgrounds in retirement income planning.
 
Financial Advisor / LPL Financial Registered Representative
CA Insurance No. 0F21186
Bill Weihman, CFP®, is a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ Practitioner, having joined RCS in 2005 after working collaboratively with several distinguished financial planners in the South Bay. Bill also spent eleven years with Nike where he led a staff of 50. Originally from the New York area, Bill’s education includes The Hotchkiss School, Harrow School (London), the Université de Strasbourg (France), and St. Lawrence University. Following in the steps of his father’s investment career, Bill has been practicing personal portfolio management since 1987. In 2004 he completed the graduate program in Personal Financial Planning with honors from the University of California Extension. He is an active member of the Silicon Valley chapter of the Financial Planning Association, and he enjoys hockey, cycling, and running in his free time. Bill’s specialties include charitable and legacy planning and required minimum distributions.
 
Financial Advisor / LPL Financial Registered Representative
CA Insurance No. 0C89497
Margaret (Peggy) Stephan, CFP®, is a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ practitioner. Peggy began her financial planning career in 1992, serving as the Command Financial Specialist while on active duty with the United States Navy. Peggy has worked in the securities industry for Merrill Lynch, where she achieved their designation of Certified Financial Manager, and at Wales Investments in San Jose, where she was the financial planner and Chief Compliance Officer. Peggy holds a Bachelor’s degree from the University of California at Berkeley. Peggy has been a member of the Financial Planning Association since 2000. Through the FPA, she coordinated a program for providing pro bono financial planning education and assistance to military families, including reservists in the local area. While on active duty, Peggy led carrier-based air logistics missions in the Western Pacific and Persian Gulf, and also flew the LC-130 Hercules in support of the National Science Foundation’s United States Antarctic Program. Peggy serves on the Board of Directors of the Moffett Field Historical Society and Museum. In her free time, she enjoys diving, hiking, travel and camping with her daughters. Peggy’s areas of specialty include Social Security, long-term care and financial issues that arise from divorce.

Financial Advisor / LPL Financial Registered Representative
CA Insurance No. 0637436
Camilla (Cam) Neri began her advising career in 1980. In 2006 & 2007, she was named one of the Top 100 Women Financial Advisors by Barron’s Magazine. Cam was also named as one of America’s Top 100 Independent Advisors for 2007 by Registered Rep Magazine as well as one of the Top 25 Wealth Advisors by the Silicon Valley / San Jose Business Journal in 2008. Cam was also among the Top 50 Independent Broker/Dealer Women Advisors in 2011 by Registered Rep magazine.* Prior to joining RCS, Cam formed and ran Neri Financial Services and was a partner at Crest Financial Services. Cam earned her undergraduate degree at Knox College in Illinois and Master’s Degree from Stanford University. She is on the Board of Silicon Valley Planned Giving and was on the Business Advisory Council for Knox College. Cam is an active member of the local chapter of the Financial Planning Association, as well as Leave a Legacy of Silicon Valley. In her free time, Cam enjoys hiking, cooking and reading mysteries. Her specialties include retirement planning for women, retirement plan distributions, estate planning and stock options.
*The Barron’s award (2006, 2007) is based on assets managed, revenue produced and quality of practice. The Business Journal award (2008) is based on assets under management, experience, and other factors. The Registered Rep awards (2007, 2011) are based on assets under management.
 
Client Services
Our Client Service Representatives are your first point of contact for day to day service needs of your accounts. They pride themselves on responding to every need in a timely manner. You will find them to be knowledgeable, professional, and helpful.
 
Operations Manager / LPL Registered Sales Assistant
Theresa L. Vasquez has been servicing clients in the financial services industry since 2000 and joined Retirement Capital Strategies in 2006.  She is registered with LPL Financial and holds a Series 6 and 63 Securities licenses. Theresa divides her time as the Manager of Operations and as your Client Service Representative.  She is responsible for entering all of the day to day trading for the firm as well as assisting clients with all of their account service needs. Theresa enjoys spending her free time with her husband, two daughters and extended family.
 

Project Manager / Client Service Associate
Marie Ann Marinovich has been with Retirement Capital Strategies since 2005 and has worked in the financial services industry for 17 years. Marie holds a Bachelor’s degree from San Jose State University and a Master’s Degree from St. Mary’s College of California. She has a broad background in project management, operations management, computer systems and has held multiple Microsoft Certified Professional (MCP) technology certifications. Marie divides her time between coordination of sales and marketing projects and initiatives, seminars, client events and as a Client Service Representative. Marie enjoys spending time with her boyfriend, family and friends as well as cycling and the outdoors.
 

Management
LPL Branch Manager / LPL Financial Registered Principal
CA Insurance No. 0745546
Thomas (Tom) Vaughan is the founder of Retirement Capital Strategies and serves as our LPL Branch Manager. Tom began his financial advising career in 1987 with First Investors Corporation, a Wall Street-based investment firm, though he has been investing in the stock market since the age of twelve. Tom graduated as a Dean’s Scholar from San Jose State University. He volunteers regularly in the classroom at a local elementary school, and he has served in the past on the Board of the Boys and Girls Club. In addition, Tom currently helps guide his young son’s award-winning golf career. Tom’s specialty is crafting our portfolio strategies.
 
CEO / Financial Advisor / LPL Financial Registered Representative
CA Insurance No. 0B51320
Mike Philipp is CEO of Retirement Capital Strategies. Mike began his investment career in 1993. He has a Bachelor’s degree from San Jose State University and received an MBA from Golden Gate University. Prior to joining RCS, he managed several manufacturing companies in Silicon Valley.  Mike and his wife have two children. As Chief Compliance Officer, Mike is also responsible for ensuring our compliance program stays current with regulations.
If you have any comments or concerns, please don’t hesitate to call us at 408-551-6100 or toll free 800-927-8314 and ask to speak with one of our financial advisors or send us an email through our Contact Us section.
 
Best Regards,
Retirement Capital Strategies
A Registered Investment Advisor
1190 Saratoga Ave, Ste. 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel (408) 551-6100
www.rcsadvisor.com








Not Receiving Our Emails? 
Join Our Email List
For Email Newsletters you can trust.


Please follow & like us: 

 

Search Our Site:





Blog Posts 

Giving Back: 6th Year Celebrating International Women’s Day 2017


YOU’RE INVITED . . . International Women’s Day Event


Art Show Photos


Blog CategoriesBlog Categories
Select Category
Annuities  (1)
Awards and Recognition  (3)
Certified Financial Planner  (3)
CFP  (3)
Charitable Contributions  (1)
Community Involvement  (2)
Divorce  (2)
Divorce Planning  (2)
Estate Planning  (2)
ETF  (1)
Events  (6)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)  (1)
Financial Planner  (4)
Financial Planning  (5)
Financial Planning for Women  (4)
Giving Back  (4)
Identity Theft  (1)
Investing  (2)
Markets  (7)
Press Release  (4)
Retirement  (5)
Retirement Income Planning  (5)
Retirement Plan Distributions  (3)
Social Security  (2)
Taxes  (3)
Women  (4)
Women and Money  (2)
Women in Transition  (3)
Women Investors  (4)



FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 













Contact Us Retirement Capital Strategies
1190 Saratoga Ave, Ste. 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel (408) 551-6100
Fax (408) 551-6161
www.rcsadvisor.com

FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 





Search Our Site:





 Market UpdatesFixed Income As A Diversifier July 27, 2017Historically, the bond market has been a pretty good indicator of increased potential for economic and geopolitical risk, and thus far we see little stress evident in the fixed income markets. Nonetheless, higher rates of economic growth and inflation, along … Continue reading → lplresearch 



Please follow & like us: 

 





Not Receiving Our Emails? Join Our Email ListFor Email Marketing you can trust. 

 








Retirement Capital Strategies - Financial Planning, Retirement Planning, Money Management, Certified Financial Planners, CFP, San Jose, CA





Securities offered through LPL Financial, Member FINRA/SIPC. Investment advice offered through Retirement Capital Strategies, a registered investment advisor and separate entity from LPL Financial.

The LPL Financial registered representatives associated with this site may only discuss and/or transact securities business with residents of the following states: AZ, CA, CO, CT, FL, HI, ID, IL, IN, MA, MD, MI, MN, MO, MT, NC, NJ, NM, NV, NY, OH, OK, OR, PA, SD, TN, TX, UT, VA, VT, WA, WI.










 

close
 
 














Social media & sharing icons powered by UltimatelySocial 


















Divorce Planning and Support – Retirement Capital Strategies





































 





























HomeTeam
Blog
Services

About Us
Awards and Recognition
Need a Second Opinion?
Financial Planning for Women
Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Retirement Planning
Money Management and Investment Strategy
Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Resources

Weekly Market Commentary

Archive – Weekly Market Commentary (2013 – Present)


Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Our NEW APP Is Here!
Retirement Accounts

Protecting Retirement Assets
Required Minimum Distributions – RMD


Social Security

Social Security:  A Strategic Approach
Understanding Social Security:  Three dates to remember
Social Security:  Important Changes for 2016 and Later Years


Long Term Care (LTC)

Long Term Care (LTC) Financial Responsibility Case


College Planning

College Planning and Saving


Identity Theft

Identity Theft Protection


Changing Jobs?
Records Management

Keeping Records
What should I Shred?


Managing Your Credit

Taking Charge of Your Credit Score


Estate Planning

Have you updated your IRA beneficiaries lately?
Estate Planning After Divorce – Rethinking
Questions to Ask When Drafting an Estate Plan
Simplify Estate Planning With a Living Trust
Should You Bypass the Bypass Trust?
What You Need to Know about Your Will
Creating a Plan for Effective Wealth Transfer
Advance Directives: Planning Ahead for Your Own Care
﻿Protect Your Assets With a Trust


Women Investors

Financial Planning for Women
Women and Financial Confidence
Women Wealth and Legacy Planning


Tax Planning

Strategy for Making Charitable Contributions


Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Videos
Clients

Review Questionnaire
Account View
Go Paperless
ARCHIVE – Review Questionnaire


Contact












Home » Resources » Divorce Planning and Support 


                                Divorce Planning and Support                            



What about the financial challenges?
 
 
 
Divorce takes an emotional toll with feelings of grief, anger & sadness.

 Can I stay in the house?
 Do I have enough money to live on?
 Which assets do I choose?
 If assets are in my spouse’s name only, can they be marital property?
Will I get spousal support?
Who do I turn to?
What happens to my children?
Do I need to go to work?
Who is responsible for our debt?

If you are going through a divorce, or considering it, we can help you see the short-term and long-term effects of different settlement options, and provide you and your attorney the powerful data needed to help support your case.

Don’t allow yourself to be taken advantage of in a divorce. Create a strategy and take control.

For family law attorneys and therapists, we offer professional resources for your clients. We help in working toward a settlement agreeable to both parties that fully addresses long-term financial needs.
We can help with the following:

Financial Affidavits
Cash Flow Analysis
Settlement Options
Inflation Consideration
Tax Issues
Insurance
Asset Division
Social Security
Pension and Retirement Plans
Present Value Analysis
Qualified Domestic Relations Order (QDRO)
Litigation Support

Untying the Knot? Divorce Life Changes, Life Challenges
About Us…..
Having a financial advocate/expert for your divorce is one of the best decisions that you will make to manage some of the uncertainty in your financial life during this difficult time. We have gone through intensive training to analyze and provide expertise on the financial issues of divorce. Education is empowerment. We can help you build a coordinated team of experts with our network of outside resources to help you financially, emotionally, physically and spiritually.
Get a copy of our free Divorce Organizer today!
To request your copy or if you should have any questions feel free to call me at 408-551-6100 or send me an email through the contact section of our website.
Best Regards,
Margaret (Peggy) Stephan, CFP®
LPL Financial Advisor
Retirement Capital Strategies
1190 Saratoga Ave, Ste. 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel (408) 551-6100
This article was written by Margaret (Peggy) Stephan, CFP® – LPL Financial Advisor at Retirement Capital Strategies. Securities offered through LPL Financial. Member FINRA/SIPC.








Not Receiving Our Emails? 
Join Our Email List
For Email Newsletters you can trust.


Please follow & like us: 

 

Search Our Site:





Blog Posts 

Giving Back: 6th Year Celebrating International Women’s Day 2017


YOU’RE INVITED . . . International Women’s Day Event


Art Show Photos


Blog CategoriesBlog Categories
Select Category
Annuities  (1)
Awards and Recognition  (3)
Certified Financial Planner  (3)
CFP  (3)
Charitable Contributions  (1)
Community Involvement  (2)
Divorce  (2)
Divorce Planning  (2)
Estate Planning  (2)
ETF  (1)
Events  (6)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)  (1)
Financial Planner  (4)
Financial Planning  (5)
Financial Planning for Women  (4)
Giving Back  (4)
Identity Theft  (1)
Investing  (2)
Markets  (7)
Press Release  (4)
Retirement  (5)
Retirement Income Planning  (5)
Retirement Plan Distributions  (3)
Social Security  (2)
Taxes  (3)
Women  (4)
Women and Money  (2)
Women in Transition  (3)
Women Investors  (4)



FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 













Contact Us Retirement Capital Strategies
1190 Saratoga Ave, Ste. 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel (408) 551-6100
Fax (408) 551-6161
www.rcsadvisor.com

FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 





Search Our Site:





 Market UpdatesFixed Income As A Diversifier July 27, 2017Historically, the bond market has been a pretty good indicator of increased potential for economic and geopolitical risk, and thus far we see little stress evident in the fixed income markets. Nonetheless, higher rates of economic growth and inflation, along … Continue reading → lplresearch 



Please follow & like us: 

 





Not Receiving Our Emails? Join Our Email ListFor Email Marketing you can trust. 

 








Retirement Capital Strategies - Financial Planning, Retirement Planning, Money Management, Certified Financial Planners, CFP, San Jose, CA





Securities offered through LPL Financial, Member FINRA/SIPC. Investment advice offered through Retirement Capital Strategies, a registered investment advisor and separate entity from LPL Financial.

The LPL Financial registered representatives associated with this site may only discuss and/or transact securities business with residents of the following states: AZ, CA, CO, CT, FL, HI, ID, IL, IN, MA, MD, MI, MN, MO, MT, NC, NJ, NM, NV, NY, OH, OK, OR, PA, SD, TN, TX, UT, VA, VT, WA, WI.










 

close
 
 














Social media & sharing icons powered by UltimatelySocial 


















Contact – Retirement Capital Strategies






































 





























HomeTeam
Blog
Services

About Us
Awards and Recognition
Need a Second Opinion?
Financial Planning for Women
Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Retirement Planning
Money Management and Investment Strategy
Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Resources

Weekly Market Commentary

Archive – Weekly Market Commentary (2013 – Present)


Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Our NEW APP Is Here!
Retirement Accounts

Protecting Retirement Assets
Required Minimum Distributions – RMD


Social Security

Social Security:  A Strategic Approach
Understanding Social Security:  Three dates to remember
Social Security:  Important Changes for 2016 and Later Years


Long Term Care (LTC)

Long Term Care (LTC) Financial Responsibility Case


College Planning

College Planning and Saving


Identity Theft

Identity Theft Protection


Changing Jobs?
Records Management

Keeping Records
What should I Shred?


Managing Your Credit

Taking Charge of Your Credit Score


Estate Planning

Have you updated your IRA beneficiaries lately?
Estate Planning After Divorce – Rethinking
Questions to Ask When Drafting an Estate Plan
Simplify Estate Planning With a Living Trust
Should You Bypass the Bypass Trust?
What You Need to Know about Your Will
Creating a Plan for Effective Wealth Transfer
Advance Directives: Planning Ahead for Your Own Care
﻿Protect Your Assets With a Trust


Women Investors

Financial Planning for Women
Women and Financial Confidence
Women Wealth and Legacy Planning


Tax Planning

Strategy for Making Charitable Contributions


Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Videos
Clients

Review Questionnaire
Account View
Go Paperless
ARCHIVE – Review Questionnaire


Contact












Home » Contact 


                                Contact                            
Retirement Capital Strategies
1190 Saratoga Ave., Suite 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel 408-551-6100
Fax 408-551-6161
www.rcsadvisor.com
Complete the form below to send us an email:
PLEASE NOTE: DO NOT INCLUDE ACCOUNT NUMBERS. THANK YOU.
Name *E-mail *Comment or Message *EmailSubmit
 
Directions to Our Office:









Not Receiving Our Emails? 
Join Our Email List
For Email Newsletters you can trust.


Please follow & like us: 

 

Search Our Site:





Blog Posts 

Giving Back: 6th Year Celebrating International Women’s Day 2017


YOU’RE INVITED . . . International Women’s Day Event


Art Show Photos


Blog CategoriesBlog Categories
Select Category
Annuities  (1)
Awards and Recognition  (3)
Certified Financial Planner  (3)
CFP  (3)
Charitable Contributions  (1)
Community Involvement  (2)
Divorce  (2)
Divorce Planning  (2)
Estate Planning  (2)
ETF  (1)
Events  (6)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)  (1)
Financial Planner  (4)
Financial Planning  (5)
Financial Planning for Women  (4)
Giving Back  (4)
Identity Theft  (1)
Investing  (2)
Markets  (7)
Press Release  (4)
Retirement  (5)
Retirement Income Planning  (5)
Retirement Plan Distributions  (3)
Social Security  (2)
Taxes  (3)
Women  (4)
Women and Money  (2)
Women in Transition  (3)
Women Investors  (4)



FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 













Contact Us Retirement Capital Strategies
1190 Saratoga Ave, Ste. 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel (408) 551-6100
Fax (408) 551-6161
www.rcsadvisor.com

FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 





Search Our Site:





 Market UpdatesFixed Income As A Diversifier July 27, 2017Historically, the bond market has been a pretty good indicator of increased potential for economic and geopolitical risk, and thus far we see little stress evident in the fixed income markets. Nonetheless, higher rates of economic growth and inflation, along … Continue reading → lplresearch 



Please follow & like us: 

 





Not Receiving Our Emails? Join Our Email ListFor Email Marketing you can trust. 

 








Retirement Capital Strategies - Financial Planning, Retirement Planning, Money Management, Certified Financial Planners, CFP, San Jose, CA





Securities offered through LPL Financial, Member FINRA/SIPC. Investment advice offered through Retirement Capital Strategies, a registered investment advisor and separate entity from LPL Financial.

The LPL Financial registered representatives associated with this site may only discuss and/or transact securities business with residents of the following states: AZ, CA, CO, CT, FL, HI, ID, IL, IN, MA, MD, MI, MN, MO, MT, NC, NJ, NM, NV, NY, OH, OK, OR, PA, SD, TN, TX, UT, VA, VT, WA, WI.










 

close
 
 














Social media & sharing icons powered by UltimatelySocial 























Review Questionnaire – Retirement Capital Strategies






































 





























HomeTeam
Blog
Services

About Us
Awards and Recognition
Need a Second Opinion?
Financial Planning for Women
Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Retirement Planning
Money Management and Investment Strategy
Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Resources

Weekly Market Commentary

Archive – Weekly Market Commentary (2013 – Present)


Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Our NEW APP Is Here!
Retirement Accounts

Protecting Retirement Assets
Required Minimum Distributions – RMD


Social Security

Social Security:  A Strategic Approach
Understanding Social Security:  Three dates to remember
Social Security:  Important Changes for 2016 and Later Years


Long Term Care (LTC)

Long Term Care (LTC) Financial Responsibility Case


College Planning

College Planning and Saving


Identity Theft

Identity Theft Protection


Changing Jobs?
Records Management

Keeping Records
What should I Shred?


Managing Your Credit

Taking Charge of Your Credit Score


Estate Planning

Have you updated your IRA beneficiaries lately?
Estate Planning After Divorce – Rethinking
Questions to Ask When Drafting an Estate Plan
Simplify Estate Planning With a Living Trust
Should You Bypass the Bypass Trust?
What You Need to Know about Your Will
Creating a Plan for Effective Wealth Transfer
Advance Directives: Planning Ahead for Your Own Care
﻿Protect Your Assets With a Trust


Women Investors

Financial Planning for Women
Women and Financial Confidence
Women Wealth and Legacy Planning


Tax Planning

Strategy for Making Charitable Contributions


Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Videos
Clients

Review Questionnaire
Account View
Go Paperless
ARCHIVE – Review Questionnaire


Contact












Home » Clients » Review Questionnaire 


                                Review Questionnaire                            
Here are some questions to help you prepare for your upcoming review meeting. Your response will ensure that we address all of the questions and concerns that you might have. Questions are not mandatory, simply a tool we use to help you get the most out of your appointment.
Agenda: Discuss, by going over questionnaire, update personal information, recap investment strategy, present financial performance, determine next steps.
PLEASE NOTE: DO NOT INCLUDE ACCOUNT NUMBERS. THANK YOU.
Name (First and Last) *Spouse/Partner Name (First and Last)Email *What are your most important financial and non-financial concerns at this time?Any life changes that might affect your financial or estate planning? (e.g. new home, new child or grandchild, marriage or divorce, illnesses, etc.)Any changes in your finances that you wish to plan for? (bonus, inheritance, job change, family obligations, benefits at work, etc.)How are you doing with managing your spending and/or saving in light of your personal goals and values?What would be the most important thing that you would like to accomplish over the next 12 months?WebsiteSubmit
 








Not Receiving Our Emails? 
Join Our Email List
For Email Newsletters you can trust.


Please follow & like us: 

 

Search Our Site:





Blog Posts 

Giving Back: 6th Year Celebrating International Women’s Day 2017


YOU’RE INVITED . . . International Women’s Day Event


Art Show Photos


Blog CategoriesBlog Categories
Select Category
Annuities  (1)
Awards and Recognition  (3)
Certified Financial Planner  (3)
CFP  (3)
Charitable Contributions  (1)
Community Involvement  (2)
Divorce  (2)
Divorce Planning  (2)
Estate Planning  (2)
ETF  (1)
Events  (6)
Exchange Traded Funds (ETF)  (1)
Financial Planner  (4)
Financial Planning  (5)
Financial Planning for Women  (4)
Giving Back  (4)
Identity Theft  (1)
Investing  (2)
Markets  (7)
Press Release  (4)
Retirement  (5)
Retirement Income Planning  (5)
Retirement Plan Distributions  (3)
Social Security  (2)
Taxes  (3)
Women  (4)
Women and Money  (2)
Women in Transition  (3)
Women Investors  (4)



FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 













Contact Us Retirement Capital Strategies
1190 Saratoga Ave, Ste. 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel (408) 551-6100
Fax (408) 551-6161
www.rcsadvisor.com

FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 





Search Our Site:





 Market UpdatesFixed Income As A Diversifier July 27, 2017Historically, the bond market has been a pretty good indicator of increased potential for economic and geopolitical risk, and thus far we see little stress evident in the fixed income markets. Nonetheless, higher rates of economic growth and inflation, along … Continue reading → lplresearch 



Please follow & like us: 

 





Not Receiving Our Emails? Join Our Email ListFor Email Marketing you can trust. 

 








Retirement Capital Strategies - Financial Planning, Retirement Planning, Money Management, Certified Financial Planners, CFP, San Jose, CA





Securities offered through LPL Financial, Member FINRA/SIPC. Investment advice offered through Retirement Capital Strategies, a registered investment advisor and separate entity from LPL Financial.

The LPL Financial registered representatives associated with this site may only discuss and/or transact securities business with residents of the following states: AZ, CA, CO, CT, FL, HI, ID, IL, IN, MA, MD, MI, MN, MO, MT, NC, NJ, NM, NV, NY, OH, OK, OR, PA, SD, TN, TX, UT, VA, VT, WA, WI.










 

close
 
 














Social media & sharing icons powered by UltimatelySocial 


















	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started














































Retirement Capital Strategies – Financial Planning, Retirement Planning, Money Management, Certified Financial Planners, CFP, San Jose, CA

































 





























HomeTeam
Blog
Services

About Us
Awards and Recognition
Need a Second Opinion?
Financial Planning for Women
Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Retirement Planning
Money Management and Investment Strategy
Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Resources

Weekly Market Commentary

Archive – Weekly Market Commentary (2013 – Present)


Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Our NEW APP Is Here!
Retirement Accounts

Protecting Retirement Assets
Required Minimum Distributions – RMD


Social Security

Social Security:  A Strategic Approach
Understanding Social Security:  Three dates to remember
Social Security:  Important Changes for 2016 and Later Years


Long Term Care (LTC)

Long Term Care (LTC) Financial Responsibility Case


College Planning

College Planning and Saving


Identity Theft

Identity Theft Protection


Changing Jobs?
Records Management

Keeping Records
What should I Shred?


Managing Your Credit

Taking Charge of Your Credit Score


Estate Planning

Have you updated your IRA beneficiaries lately?
Estate Planning After Divorce – Rethinking
Questions to Ask When Drafting an Estate Plan
Simplify Estate Planning With a Living Trust
Should You Bypass the Bypass Trust?
What You Need to Know about Your Will
Creating a Plan for Effective Wealth Transfer
Advance Directives: Planning Ahead for Your Own Care
﻿Protect Your Assets With a Trust


Women Investors

Financial Planning for Women
Women and Financial Confidence
Women Wealth and Legacy Planning


Tax Planning

Strategy for Making Charitable Contributions


Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Videos
Clients

Review Questionnaire
Account View
Go Paperless
ARCHIVE – Review Questionnaire


Contact














Money Management and Investment Strategy
Read more about our unique investment strategy and money management style.










LPL Weekly Market Commentary
Read about what's happening in this week's markets.










Need a Second Opinion on your investments?
Many people are familiar with asking a doctor for a second opinion on a medical diagnosis, and we are finding that clients are also asking for a second opinion on their financial situation as well.










Download our NEW APP available on both iPhone and Android phones!
Our NEW APP will allow you to gain access to daily news, blogs, setup an appointment, make a one touch call, send us an email, view your accounts, get directions and more!










Why a Certified Financial Planner (CFP)?
How do you know if you could benefit from the services of a financial planner?  If you simply don’t have the time or desire to plan and manage certain financial aspects of your life, a professional planner might be a good fit.




















                Your Retirement. Our Passion.            











                                Retirement Income Planning                            


                            We can help you clarify your vision for retirement, balance competing priorities, identify and develop the financial resources to provide for your needs and wishes in retirement.                        









                                Financial Planning for Women                            


                            What is Financial Planning for Women? There are many strengths that women bring to the financial planning process.                        









                                Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ - CFP®?                             


                            How do you know if you could benefit from the services of a financial planner? If you simply don’t have the time or desire to plan and manage certain financial aspects of your life, a professional planner might be a good fit.                        









                                Account View                            


                            Accessed from a computer, tablet or smartphone, Account View is your secure, convenient, 24-hour online access to your investment account information.                        















Latest From The Blog



 

Giving Back: 6th Year Celebrating I...

In honor of International Women’s Day 2017, and for the sixth consecutive year, we hosted a gift bag making party. The gift bags were donated to Next Door.
Next Door is a local non-profit agency providing victims of domestic violence with safe, effective […]
Continue Reading →







YOU’RE INVITED . . . Internat...
YOU’RE INVITED . . .
In honor of International Women’s Day, we’re inviting clients to join us for a special event.
WHY
 Please join us at the Retirement Capital Strategies office on Wednesday, March 8th @ 3:30 PM to help fill tote […]
Continue Reading →




 

Art Show Photos...

Fall 2016
In celebration of the artistic talents in our midst we held another open house in 2016 showcasing the works of several of our clients. Our office was turned into an art gallery with paintings, quilts, embroidery, sculptures, print samples, ceramic […]
Continue Reading →




Prev

Next




 














Contact Us Retirement Capital Strategies
1190 Saratoga Ave, Ste. 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel (408) 551-6100
Fax (408) 551-6161
www.rcsadvisor.com

FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 





Search Our Site:





 Market UpdatesFixed Income As A Diversifier July 27, 2017Historically, the bond market has been a pretty good indicator of increased potential for economic and geopolitical risk, and thus far we see little stress evident in the fixed income markets. Nonetheless, higher rates of economic growth and inflation, along … Continue reading → lplresearch 



Please follow & like us: 

 





Not Receiving Our Emails? Join Our Email ListFor Email Marketing you can trust. 

 








Retirement Capital Strategies - Financial Planning, Retirement Planning, Money Management, Certified Financial Planners, CFP, San Jose, CA





Securities offered through LPL Financial, Member FINRA/SIPC. Investment advice offered through Retirement Capital Strategies, a registered investment advisor and separate entity from LPL Financial.

The LPL Financial registered representatives associated with this site may only discuss and/or transact securities business with residents of the following states: AZ, CA, CO, CT, FL, HI, ID, IL, IN, MA, MD, MI, MN, MO, MT, NC, NJ, NM, NV, NY, OH, OK, OR, PA, SD, TN, TX, UT, VA, VT, WA, WI.










 

close
 
 














Social media & sharing icons powered by UltimatelySocial 


























Retirement Capital Strategies – Financial Planning, Retirement Planning, Money Management, Certified Financial Planners, CFP, San Jose, CA


































 





























HomeTeam
Blog
Services

About Us
Awards and Recognition
Need a Second Opinion?
Financial Planning for Women
Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Retirement Planning
Money Management and Investment Strategy
Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Resources

Weekly Market Commentary

Archive – Weekly Market Commentary (2013 – Present)


Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ – CFP®?
Our NEW APP Is Here!
Retirement Accounts

Protecting Retirement Assets
Required Minimum Distributions – RMD


Social Security

Social Security:  A Strategic Approach
Understanding Social Security:  Three dates to remember
Social Security:  Important Changes for 2016 and Later Years


Long Term Care (LTC)

Long Term Care (LTC) Financial Responsibility Case


College Planning

College Planning and Saving


Identity Theft

Identity Theft Protection


Changing Jobs?
Records Management

Keeping Records
What should I Shred?


Managing Your Credit

Taking Charge of Your Credit Score


Estate Planning

Have you updated your IRA beneficiaries lately?
Estate Planning After Divorce – Rethinking
Questions to Ask When Drafting an Estate Plan
Simplify Estate Planning With a Living Trust
Should You Bypass the Bypass Trust?
What You Need to Know about Your Will
Creating a Plan for Effective Wealth Transfer
Advance Directives: Planning Ahead for Your Own Care
﻿Protect Your Assets With a Trust


Women Investors

Financial Planning for Women
Women and Financial Confidence
Women Wealth and Legacy Planning


Tax Planning

Strategy for Making Charitable Contributions


Divorce Planning and Support
Videos


Videos
Clients

Review Questionnaire
Account View
Go Paperless
ARCHIVE – Review Questionnaire


Contact














Money Management and Investment Strategy
Read more about our unique investment strategy and money management style.










LPL Weekly Market Commentary
Read about what's happening in this week's markets.










Need a Second Opinion on your investments?
Many people are familiar with asking a doctor for a second opinion on a medical diagnosis, and we are finding that clients are also asking for a second opinion on their financial situation as well.










Download our NEW APP available on both iPhone and Android phones!
Our NEW APP will allow you to gain access to daily news, blogs, setup an appointment, make a one touch call, send us an email, view your accounts, get directions and more!










Why a Certified Financial Planner (CFP)?
How do you know if you could benefit from the services of a financial planner?  If you simply don’t have the time or desire to plan and manage certain financial aspects of your life, a professional planner might be a good fit.




















                Your Retirement. Our Passion.            











                                Retirement Income Planning                            


                            We can help you clarify your vision for retirement, balance competing priorities, identify and develop the financial resources to provide for your needs and wishes in retirement.                        









                                Financial Planning for Women                            


                            What is Financial Planning for Women? There are many strengths that women bring to the financial planning process.                        









                                Why Choose a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ - CFP®?                             


                            How do you know if you could benefit from the services of a financial planner? If you simply don’t have the time or desire to plan and manage certain financial aspects of your life, a professional planner might be a good fit.                        









                                Account View                            


                            Accessed from a computer, tablet or smartphone, Account View is your secure, convenient, 24-hour online access to your investment account information.                        















Latest From The Blog



 

Giving Back: 6th Year Celebrating I...

In honor of International Women’s Day 2017, and for the sixth consecutive year, we hosted a gift bag making party. The gift bags were donated to Next Door.
Next Door is a local non-profit agency providing victims of domestic violence with safe, effective […]
Continue Reading →







YOU’RE INVITED . . . Internat...
YOU’RE INVITED . . .
In honor of International Women’s Day, we’re inviting clients to join us for a special event.
WHY
 Please join us at the Retirement Capital Strategies office on Wednesday, March 8th @ 3:30 PM to help fill tote […]
Continue Reading →




 

Art Show Photos...

Fall 2016
In celebration of the artistic talents in our midst we held another open house in 2016 showcasing the works of several of our clients. Our office was turned into an art gallery with paintings, quilts, embroidery, sculptures, print samples, ceramic […]
Continue Reading →




Prev

Next




 














Contact Us Retirement Capital Strategies
1190 Saratoga Ave, Ste. 140
San Jose, CA 95129
Tel (408) 551-6100
Fax (408) 551-6161
www.rcsadvisor.com

FINRA’s Broker Check Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on  
FINRA’s Broker Check 





Search Our Site:





 Market UpdatesFixed Income As A Diversifier July 27, 2017Historically, the bond market has been a pretty good indicator of increased potential for economic and geopolitical risk, and thus far we see little stress evident in the fixed income markets. Nonetheless, higher rates of economic growth and inflation, along … Continue reading → lplresearch 



Please follow & like us: 

 





Not Receiving Our Emails? Join Our Email ListFor Email Marketing you can trust. 

 








Retirement Capital Strategies - Financial Planning, Retirement Planning, Money Management, Certified Financial Planners, CFP, San Jose, CA





Securities offered through LPL Financial, Member FINRA/SIPC. Investment advice offered through Retirement Capital Strategies, a registered investment advisor and separate entity from LPL Financial.

The LPL Financial registered representatives associated with this site may only discuss and/or transact securities business with residents of the following states: AZ, CA, CO, CT, FL, HI, ID, IL, IN, MA, MD, MI, MN, MO, MT, NC, NJ, NM, NV, NY, OH, OK, OR, PA, SD, TN, TX, UT, VA, VT, WA, WI.










 

close
 
 














Social media & sharing icons powered by UltimatelySocial 

















